California statutes. Education Code
(4) Corrective action required pursuant to this subdivision shall be implemented as soon as possible and no later than the beginning of the next school year.

(b) A local educational agency that the Superintendent determines violated subdivision (a) of Section 244 shall be assessed a financial penalty against its total principal apportionment funding for the applicable fiscal year made to the local educational
 agency pursuant to Sections 41330, 41332, and 41335, as applicable. The amount withheld shall not exceed the local educational agency’s total expenditures on the textbooks, instructional materials, supplemental instructional materials, or curriculum found to violate subdivision (a) of Section 244. A reduction pursuant to this subdivision shall not reduce the final apportionment below the amount necessary to meet the requirements of both Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution, as specified in Section 41975, and Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 9.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

60152.

(a) If a local educational agency or the Superintendent determines that, pursuant to a complaint filed directly with the Superintendent or on appeal of a local educational agency’s decision regarding a complaint, an organization contracted to provide any textbook, instructional material, professional development material, supplemental instructional material, or curriculum violates subdivision (a) of Section 244, the local educational agency or the Superintendent shall notify the organization that it must take corrective action. If corrective action is not taken within 60 days, the department may use any means authorized by law to
 effect compliance.

(b) An organization that contracts to provide a textbook, instructional material, professional development material, supplemental instructional material, or
 curriculum that the local educational agency or the Superintendent determines to be a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 244 shall do both of the following:

(1) Reimburse all funds received for their services from the local educational agency.

(2) (A) Disclose the determination that they have been found in violation of the state’s antidiscrimination laws by notifying every local educational agency that they are contracted with to provide services for and as part of any proposal to contract their services with a local educational agency.

(B) The disclosure made pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall conspicuously display hyperlinks to the published documentation of the determination
 from the local educational agency or the Superintendent that the organization violated subdivision (a) of Section 244.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 10.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Elementary School Materials [60200. - 60313.]



  ARTICLE 1. Selection and Adoption [60200. - 60213.]

60200.

The state board shall adopt basic instructional materials for use in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, for governing boards, subject to the following provisions:

(a) The state board shall adopt at least five basic instructional materials for all applicable grade levels in each of the following subject areas:

(1) Language arts, including, but not limited to, spelling, reading, and English language development.

(2) Mathematics.

(3) Science.

(4) Social science.

(5) Bilingual or bicultural subjects.

(6) Any other subject, discipline, or interdisciplinary areas for which the state board determines the adoption of instructional materials to be necessary or desirable.

(b) (1) The state board shall adopt procedures for the submission of basic instructional materials in order to comply with each of the following:

(A) Instructional materials may be submitted for adoption in any of the subject areas pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) at least once but not more than twice every eight years. The state board shall ensure that curriculum frameworks are reviewed and adopted in each subject area and that the criteria for evaluating instructional materials developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60204 are consistent
 with subdivision (c). The state board may prescribe reasonable conditions to restrict the resubmission of materials that have been previously rejected if those resubmitted materials have no substantive changes.

(B) If a publisher or manufacturer submits revisions to currently adopted instructional material for review after the timeframe specified by the state board, the department shall assess a fee on the submitting publisher or manufacturer in an amount that shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department to conduct a review of the instructional material pursuant to this section.

(C) Submitted instructional materials shall be adopted or rejected within six months of the submission date of the materials pursuant to paragraph (1) unless the state board determines that a longer period of time, not to exceed an additional three months, is necessary due to the estimated
 volume or complexity of the materials for that subject in that year, or due to other circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the state board.

(D) The process for review of instructional materials shall involve review committees, which shall include, but not be limited to, volunteer content experts and instructional material reviewers, and shall be composed of a majority of classroom teachers from a wide variety of affected grade levels and subject areas.

(E) The rules and procedures for adoption of instructional materials shall be transparent and consistently applicable regardless of the format of the instructional materials, which may include, but not be limited to, print, digital, and open-source instructional materials.

(2) The implementation of this subdivision shall be contingent upon an appropriation for
 these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute. This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(c) In reviewing and adopting or recommending for adoption submitted basic instructional materials, the state board shall use the following criteria, and ensure that, in its judgment, the submitted basic instructional materials meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Are consistent with the criteria and the standards of quality prescribed in the state board’s adopted curriculum framework. In making this determination, the state board shall consider both the framework and the submitted instructional materials as a whole.

(2) Comply with the requirements of Sections 60040, 60041, 60042, 60043, 60044, 60048, 60200.5, and 60200.6, and the state board’s guidelines for social content.

(3) Are factually accurate and incorporate principles of instruction reflective of current and confirmed research.

(4) Are aligned to the content standards adopted by the state board in the subject area and the grade level or levels for which they are submitted.

(5) Do not contain materials, including illustrations, that provide unnecessary exposure to a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo. Materials, including illustrations, that contain a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo may not be used unless the state board determines that the use of the commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo is appropriate based on one of the following specific findings:

(A) If text, the use of the commercial
 brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in the instructional materials is necessary for an educational purpose, as defined in the guidelines or frameworks adopted by the state board.

(B) If an illustration, the appearance of a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in an illustration in instructional materials is incidental to the general nature of the illustration.

(6) Meet other criteria as are established by the state board as being necessary to accomplish the intent of Section 7.5 of Article IX of the California Constitution and of Section 1 of Chapter 1181 of the Statutes of 1989, provided that the criteria are approved by resolution at the time the resolution adopting the framework for the current adoption is approved, or at least 12 months before the date that the materials are to be approved for adoption.

(d) If basic instructional materials are rejected, the state board shall provide a specific, written explanation of the reasons why the submitted materials were not adopted, based on one or more of the criteria established under subdivision (c). In providing this explanation, the state board may use, in whole or in part, materials written by the Superintendent or any other advisers to the state board.

(e) The state board may adopt fewer than five basic instructional materials in each subject area for each grade level if either of the following occurs:

(1) Fewer than five basic instructional materials are submitted.

(2) The state board specifically finds that fewer than five basic instructional materials meet the criteria prescribed by paragraphs (1) to
 (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c), or the materials fail to meet the state board’s adopted curriculum framework. If the state board adopts fewer than five basic instructional materials in any subject for any grade level, the state board shall conduct a review of the degree to which the criteria and procedures used to evaluate the submitted materials for that adoption were consistent with the state board’s adopted curriculum framework.

(f) This section does not limit the authority of the state board to adopt materials that are not basic instructional materials.

(g) Consistent with the quality criteria for the state board’s adopted curriculum framework, the state board shall prescribe procedures to provide the most open and flexible materials submission system and ensure that the adopted materials in each subject, taken as a whole, provide for the educational needs of the diverse
 pupil populations in the public schools, provide collections of instructional materials that illustrate diverse points of view, represent cultural pluralism, and provide a broad spectrum of knowledge, information, and technology-based materials to meet the goals of the program and the needs of pupils.

(h) Upon making an adoption, the state board shall make available to listed publishers and manufacturers and all school interests a listing of instructional materials, including the most current unit cost of those materials as computed pursuant to existing law. Items placed upon lists shall remain thereon, and be available for procurement through the state’s systems of financing, from the date of the adoption of the item and until a date established by the state board. The date established by the state board for continuing items on that list shall be the date on which the state board adopts instructional materials based on a new or revised
 curriculum framework. Lists of adopted instructional materials shall be made available by subject and grade level to school districts and posted on the department’s internet website, and shall include information from the reports of findings from the review committees pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b). The lists shall terminate and shall no longer be effective on the date prescribed by the state board pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) The state board may approve multiple lists of instructional materials, without designating a grade or subject, and the state board may designate more than one grade or subject whenever it determines that a single subject designation or a single grade designation would not promote the maximum efficiency of pupil learning. Any materials so designated may be placed on single grade or single subject lists, or multigrade or interdisciplinary lists, or may be placed on separate lists including other materials
 with similar grade or subject designations.

(j) A composite listing in the format of an order form may be used to meet the requirements of this section.

(k) The lists maintained pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to control the use period by any school district.

(l) The state board shall give publishers the opportunity to modify instructional materials, in a manner provided for in regulations adopted by the state board, if the state board finds that the instructional materials do not comply with paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(m) This section does not prohibit the publisher of instructional materials from including whatever corporate name or logo on the instructional materials that is necessary to provide basic information about the
 publisher, to protect its copyright, or to identify third-party sources of content.

(n) The state board may adopt regulations that provide for other exceptions to this section, as determined by the state board.

(o) The Superintendent shall develop, and the state board shall adopt, guidelines to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 85.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.2.

(a) In addition to the findings authorized under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 60200, if the state board finds that the use of a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in an instructional material is authorized under a contract entered into under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35182.5 as added by Assembly Bill 117 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session, the state board may allow the use of that instructional material.

(b) This section shall become operative only if Section 35182.5 as proposed by Assembly Bill 117 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session is enacted and takes effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.4.

(a) The State Board of Education shall ensure that the basic instructional materials that it adopts for mathematics and reading in grades 1 to 8, inclusive, are based on the fundamental skills required by these subjects, including, but not limited to, systematic, explicit phonics, spelling, and basic computational skills.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fundamental skills of all subject areas, including systematic, explicit phonics, spelling, and basic computational skills, be included in the adopted curriculum frameworks and that these skills and related tasks increase in depth and complexity from year to year. It is the intent of the Legislature that the instructional materials adopted by the State Board of Education meet the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 765, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.5.

Instructional materials adopted under this chapter shall, where appropriate, be designed to impress upon the minds of the pupils the principles of morality, truth, justice, patriotism, and a true comprehension of the rights, duties, and dignity of American citizenship, and to instruct them in manners and morals and the principles of a free government. The State Board of Education shall endeavor to see that this objective is accomplished in the evaluation of instructional materials for educational content in appropriate subject areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 918, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.6.

Instructional materials adopted pursuant to this chapter for the category of social science as specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 60200 shall include information designed to instruct pupils on Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., the civil rights movement, and contributions made by ethnic minority groups to the history of the United States. The state board shall ensure that the materials present the information in a manner consistent with the instruction provided in each grade level. The state board shall endeavor to see that this objective is accomplished in the evaluation of instructional materials for educational content.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 60200 and 60200.1, the state board shall not adopt instructional materials or follow the procedures adopted pursuant to Sections 60200 and 60200.1 until the 2015–16 school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 7, Sec. 32.   (SB 70)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 60200.7, the state board may consider the adoption of a revised curriculum framework and evaluation criteria for instructional materials in history-social science.

(b) The department shall conduct work necessary to revise the curriculum framework and evaluation criteria for instructional materials in history-social science only after it has completed work related to the development of curriculum frameworks for the common core academic content standards pursuant to Section 60207.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 46.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60200.9.

On or before January 31, 2017, the state board shall consider the adoption of a revised curriculum framework and evaluation criteria for instructional materials in science. The revised curriculum framework shall be based on the science content standards adopted pursuant to former Section
 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014.
 In adopting the revised curriculum framework, the state board shall ensure both of the following:

(a) Inclusion of English language development strategies that are aligned to the standards adopted pursuant to Section 60811.

(b) Inclusion of strategies to address the needs of pupils with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   (SB 652)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

60201.

In approving and maintaining lists of adopted instructional materials, the state board shall, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 60200, do any one or more of the following, when applicable:

(a) Retain any instructional materials from a previous list and biennially make any adjustment in prices based on information provided pursuant to Section 60223.

(b) Delete from the lists any instructional material which it determines is obsolete pursuant to Section 60500, or which received no order from any district board during the previous two years.

(c) Add instructional materials not previously submitted for adoption, or materials previously submitted which have been revised to comply with any recommendations of the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 251, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60202.

Before final adoption of any instructional materials not currently listed, the state board shall make any instructional materials proposed for adoption available for public inspection for not less than 30 days at display centers designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. There shall be an adequate distribution of display centers throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

60203.

(a) The state board shall hold a public hearing before adopting instructional materials for use in the elementary schools of the state.

(b) Upon review of the commission’s recommendations for instructional materials, the Superintendent may make alternative recommendations for instructional materials and the state board shall consider the Superintendent’s recommendations before making its decision to adopt instructional materials.

(c) The state board shall consider comments from other advisory bodies and the public before making its decision to adopt instructional materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 668, Sec. 5.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

60204.

The Instructional Quality Commission established pursuant to Section 33530 shall do all of the following:

(a) Recommend curriculum frameworks to the state board.

(b) Develop criteria for evaluating instructional materials submitted for adoption so that the materials adopted shall adequately cover the subjects in the indicated grade or grades and comply with the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 60040) of Chapter 1. The criteria developed by the commission shall be consistent with the duties of the state board pursuant to Section 60200. The criteria shall be public information and shall be provided in written or printed form to any person requesting that
 information.

(1) The criteria for English language arts instructional materials shall include directions to publishers to align both lessons and teacher’s editions, as appropriate, with English language development standards and incorporate strategies to address, at every grade level, the needs of all English learners. The criteria for other subject areas shall include directions to publishers to incorporate strategies for English learners that are consistent with the English language development standards.

(2) The criteria also shall include directions to publishers to incorporate instructional strategies to address the needs of pupils with disabilities in both lessons and teacher’s editions, as appropriate, at every grade level and subject.

(c) Study and evaluate instructional materials submitted for adoption.

(d) Recommend instructional materials for adoption to the state board.

(e) Recommend to the state board policies and activities to assist the department and school districts in the use of the curriculum framework and other available model curriculum materials for the purpose of guiding and strengthening the quality of instruction in the public schools.

(f) Advise and make recommendations to the state board, including, but not limited to, what policies and activities are needed to implement the state’s academic content standards, and bring the state’s curriculum frameworks, instructional materials, professional development programs, pupil assessments, and academic accountability systems into alignment with those standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 608, Sec. 7.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

60205.

(a) On or before January 31, 2027, the state board shall, in adherence with the procedures established pursuant to Section 60227, adopt instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, in English language arts and English language development.

(b) The state board shall ensure that instructional materials adopted pursuant to this section adhere to all of the following:

(1) Align to the current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework, including integrated and designated English language development
 instruction adopted by the state board, and including strategies to meet the varied language development needs of English learners.

(2) Align to evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, which shall include explicit and systematic instruction in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency, and attending to oral and written language development, vocabulary and background knowledge, and comprehension, including tiered supports for pupils with reading difficulties, English learners, and pupils with
 exceptional needs.

(3) Align to the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.

(4) Include materials that focus on the teaching of specific skills and standards that are a subset of the entire English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework and clearly designate which standards they effectively address.

(c) Upon the adoption of instructional materials pursuant to subdivision (a), the state board shall update the state Guidance for Local Instructional Materials Adoptions to reflect the criteria in subdivision (b). A local educational agency shall follow this guidance and the processes described in Section 60002 for purposes of adopting instructional materials.

(d) (1) A local educational agency that adopts instructional materials that have not been adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall certify that the instructional materials align to the criteria in subdivision (b).

(2) A local educational agency may adopt a set of instructional materials that, in combination, address all of the state standards and components of the English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state board’s adoption of instructional materials in English language arts and English language development include high-quality instructional materials
 in pupils’ primary languages to enable teachers to build upon pupils’ linguistic assets in programs for which English learner pupils are being instructed in their primary language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 471, Sec. 3.   (AB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

60206.

The state board may adopt appropriate regulations to implement this chapter. These regulations may include a procedure to review district invoices for instructional materials purchases made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60242.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1503, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

60207.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 60200.7, the state board shall adopt both of the following:

(1) Revised curriculum frameworks and evaluation criteria that are aligned to the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 for English language arts no later than July 30, 2014.

(2) Revised curriculum frameworks that are aligned to the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 for mathematics no later than November 30, 2013.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 60200.7, the state board may adopt instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, that are aligned to the
 content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 for mathematics no later than March 30, 2014.

(1) For purposes of adopting instructional materials for mathematics pursuant to this subdivision, the state board may adopt evaluation criteria for mathematics no later than March 31, 2013. The criteria may allow for the adoption of materials that have been reviewed and adopted by another state that has adopted the common core academic content standards.

(2) Instructional materials adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain adopted until the next statewide adoption of instructional materials for mathematics.

(c) State board policies shall ensure that the English language arts curriculum frameworks for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
 inclusive, include the English language development standards as adopted by the state board in 1997 and revised thereafter, and English language development strategies in the core subjects of mathematics, science, and history-social science.

(d) State board policies shall ensure that curriculum frameworks for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, include strategies to address the needs of pupils with disabilities in the four core subjects of mathematics, science, history-social science, and English language arts.

(e) Each curriculum framework that the state board adopts shall describe, to the extent the state board deems appropriate, the manner in which content can be delivered to intentionally build all of the following skills into and across each content area:

(1) Creativity and innovation, including, but not limited to, thinking creatively, working creatively with others, and implementing innovations.

(2) Critical thinking and problem solving, including, but not limited to, reasoning effectively, using systems thinking, making judgments and decisions, and solving problems.

(3) Collaboration, including, but not limited to, working effectively in diverse teams, adapting to change and being flexible, demonstrating initiative and self-direction, working independently, demonstrating productivity and accountability, and demonstrating leadership and responsibility.

(4) Communication, including, but not limited to, communicating clearly and effectively through reading, writing, and speaking.

(5) Construction and exploration of new understandings of knowledge through the integration of content from one subject area to another to provide pupils with multiple modes for demonstrating innovative learning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 480, Sec. 3.   (SB 300)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60208.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to do both of the following:

(1) Provide to local educational agencies a process that involves teachers, and is consistent with the implementation of standards-based curricula and the principle of local control.

(2) Consistent with Section 60200.7, ensure that school districts are provided with as many high-quality standards-aligned instructional material options as possible, so that educators may have many rigorous options in choosing the best materials that meet the needs of all pupils, including English learners and pupils with disabilities, and that ensure that their pupils are able to master the
 academic content standards adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60605.8.

(b) The Superintendent, in collaboration with the state board, teachers of various grade levels and subject areas, district and county office of education curriculum administrators selected from various geographic areas, professional development training experts, and representatives from postsecondary institutions or other educational agencies and organizations, as deemed appropriate by the Superintendent, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop criteria to guide the development of model professional development modules that provide critical information and strategies to be used as the common core academic content standards are implemented. The criteria shall be based on the California Standards for the Teaching Professions and developed in consideration of the National Staff Development
 Council’s Standards for Staff Development.

(2) Develop model professional development modules for teachers, principals, and school leaders that incorporate, make use of, and build upon existing professional development programs and opportunities currently available at the local, state, and national levels to deepen the understanding of at least all of the following:

(A) The common core academic content standards.

(B) Instructional strategies to support the learning of all pupils, including English learners, pupils with disabilities, and underperforming pupils.

(C) Instructional strategies that promote creativity, innovation, critical thinking, problem solving, collaboration, and communication skills in all academic content areas.

(D) The integration of subject content knowledge.

(E) Instructional leadership and coaching.

(c) Model professional development modules shall be designed for delivery through various methods, including, but not limited to, school-based and web-based delivery.

(d) The Superintendent shall report to the state board on the development pursuant to subdivision (b) of the model professional development modules.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 608, Sec. 9.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

60210.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency may use instructional materials that are aligned with the academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 or 60605.8, or former Section 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014, including instructional materials that have not been adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60200.

(b) Instructional materials for mathematics and English language arts that are aligned to common core academic content standards developed by the Common Core State Standards Initiative consortium pursuant to Section 60605.7 shall be deemed to be aligned to the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 or 60605.8 for purposes of Section 60119.

(c) If a local educational agency chooses to use instructional materials that have not been adopted by the state board, the local educational agency shall ensure that a majority of the participants of any review process conducted by the local educational agency are classroom teachers who are assigned to the subject area or grade level of the materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 15.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

60212.

For purposes of adopting basic instructional materials for history-social science pursuant to Section 60200, all of the following shall apply:

(a) (1) The department shall provide notice, pursuant to paragraph (2), to all publishers or manufacturers known to produce basic instructional materials in that subject, post an appropriate notice on the Internet Web site of the department, and take other reasonable measures to ensure that appropriate notice is widely circulated to potentially interested publishers and manufacturers.

(2) The notice shall specify that each publisher or manufacturer choosing to participate in the adoption process
 shall be assessed a fee based on the number of programs the publisher or manufacturer indicates will be submitted for review and the number of grade levels proposed to be covered by each program.

(b) The department, before incurring substantial costs for the adoption process, shall require that a publisher or manufacturer that wishes to participate in the adoption process first declare the intent to submit one or more specific programs for adoption and specify the specific grade levels to be covered by each program.

(c) After a publisher or manufacturer has declared its intent to submit one or more programs and the grade levels to be covered by each program, the department shall assess a fee that shall be payable by the publisher or manufacturer even if the publisher or manufacturer subsequently chooses to withdraw a program or reduce the number of grade levels covered.

(d) The fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be in an amount that does not exceed the reasonable costs to the department in conducting the adoption process. The department shall take reasonable steps to limit costs of the adoption and to keep the fee modest.

(e) A submission by a publisher or manufacturer shall not be reviewed for purposes of adoption until the fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) has been paid in full.

(f) (1) Upon the request of a small publisher or small manufacturer, the state board may reduce the fee for participation in the adoption.

(2) For purposes of this section, “small publisher” and “small manufacturer” mean an independently owned or operated publisher or manufacturer that is not dominant in
 its field of operation and that, together with its affiliates, has 100 or fewer employees, and has average annual gross receipts of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less over the previous three years.

(g) If the department determines that there is little or no interest in participating in an adoption by publishers and manufacturers, the department shall recommend to the state board whether or not the adoption shall be conducted, and the state board may choose not to conduct the adoption.

(h) Revenue derived from fees assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be budgeted as reimbursements and subject to review through the annual budget process, and may be used to pay for costs associated with any adoption and for any costs associated with the review of instructional materials, including costs of substitutes for teacher reviewers and stipends for content review
 experts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 37.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

60213.

For purposes of adopting basic instructional materials in a given subject area pursuant to Section 60200, all of the following shall apply:

(a) (1) Before conducting an adoption in a given subject area, the department shall provide notice, pursuant to paragraph (2), to all publishers or manufacturers known to produce basic instructional materials in that subject area, post an appropriate notice on the Internet Web site of the department, and take other reasonable measures to ensure that appropriate notice is widely circulated to potentially interested publishers and manufacturers.

(2) The notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall specify that each publisher or manufacturer
 choosing to participate in the adoption process shall be assessed a fee based on the number of programs the publisher or manufacturer indicates will be submitted for review and the number of grade levels proposed to be covered by each program.

(b) The department, before incurring substantial costs for the adoption, shall require that a publisher or manufacturer who wishes to participate in the adoption first declare the intent to submit one or more specific programs for adoption and specify the specific grade levels to be covered by each program. After a publisher or manufacturer has declared the intent to submit one or more programs and the grade levels to be covered by each program, the department shall assess a fee. The fee shall be payable by the publisher or manufacturer even if the publisher or manufacturer subsequently chooses to withdraw a program or reduce the number of grade levels covered. A submission by a publisher or manufacturer
 shall not be reviewed for purposes of adoption until the fee assessed has been paid in full.

(c) The fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall cover the cost of conducting the adoption. The department shall take reasonable steps to limit costs of the adoption and to keep the fee modest.

(d) (1) Upon the request of a small publisher or small manufacturer, the state board may reduce the fee for participation in the adoption.

(2) For purposes of this section, “small publisher” and “small manufacturer” mean an independently owned or operated publisher or manufacturer who is not dominant in its field of operation, and who, together with its affiliates, has 100 or fewer employees, and has average annual gross receipts of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less over the previous three years.

(e) Revenue derived from fees assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be budgeted as reimbursements and subject to review through the annual budget process, and may be used to pay for costs associated with any adoption and for any costs associated with the review of instructional materials, including costs of substitutes for teacher reviewers and stipends for content review experts.

(f) If the department determines that there is little or no interest in participating in an adoption by publishers and manufacturers, the department shall recommend to the state board whether or not the adoption shall be conducted, and the state board may choose not to conduct the adoption.

(g) General fund revenue shall not be used for the cost of conducting an adoption of instructional
 materials.
